en: raspberry flavouring
bg: аромат малина
de: Himbeeraroma, Himbeer-Aroma
es: sabor a frambuesa
fi: vadelma-aromi, vadelman aromi
fr: arôme framboise
hr: aroma maline
hu: málna aroma
it: aroma di lampone
nl: frambozenaroma
pl: aromat malinowy

en: orange blossom flavouring
de: Orangenblütenaroma, Orangenblüten-Aroma
fi: appelsiininkukka-aromi
fr: arôme fleur d'oranger
hr: aroma cvijeta naranče
hu: narancsvirág aroma
it: aroma di fiori d'arancio
nl: sinaasappelbloemaroma

en: natural orange blossom flavouring
de: natürliches Orangenblütenaroma, natürliches Orangenblüten-Aroma
fi: luontainen appelsiininkukka-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de fleur d'oranger
hr: prirodna aroma cvijeta naranče
hu: természetes narancsvirág aroma
it: aroma naturale di fiori d'arancio

en: seafood flavouring
de: Meeresfrüchtearoma, Meeresfrüchte-Aroma
es: sabor a mariscos
fi: merenelävien aromi
fr: arôme de fruits de mer
hr: aroma plodova mora
hu: tenger gyümölcsei aroma
it: aroma di frutti di mare
nl: zeevruchtenaroma

en: fruit flavouring
da: frugtaroma
de: Fruchtarom, Frucht-Aroma
es: aroma de frutas, aroma de fruta, aroma frutal
fi: hedelmäaromi
fr: arôme de fruit, arômes de fruits
hr: voćna aroma
hu: gyümölcsaroma, gyümölcs aroma
it: aroma di frutta

en: passion fruit flavouring, passion fruit flavour
de: Passionsfruchtaroma, Passionfrucht-Aroma
es: aroma de fruta de la pasión
fi: passiohedelmäaromi
fr: arôme de fruit de la passion
hr: aroma marakuje
hu: maracuja aroma
it: aroma di frutto della passione
pl: aromat marakui
sv: passionsfruktarom, maracuja arom

en: celery flavouring
de: Sellerie-Aroma
es: aroma de apio
fi: selleriaromi
fr: arôme de céleri
hr: aroma celera
hu: zeller aroma
it: aroma di sedano

en: laurel flavouring
de: Lorbeeraroma, Lorbeer-Aroma
fi: laakerinlehtiaromi
fr: arôme de laurier
hr: aroma lovora
it: aroma di alloro
pt: aroma de louro

en: laurel extract
da: laurbærekstrakt
de: Lorbeerextrakt
fr: extrait de laurier
hr: ekstrakt lovora
it: estratto di alloro
pt: extrato de louro, extracto de louro

en: crustaceans flavouring
de: Krustentieraroma, Schalentieraroma
fi: äyriäisaromi
fr: arôme de crustacés
hr: aroma rakova
it: aroma di crostacei

en: natural crustaceans flavouring
de: Natürliches Krustentieraroma
fr: arôme naturel de crustacés
hr: prirodne arome rakova
it: aroma naturale di crostacei

fr: arôme de gentiane
fi: katkeroaromi

en: milk flavouring
de: Milcharoma
es: aroma de leche
fr: arôme de lait
hr: aroma mlijeka
hu: tej aroma
it: aroma di latte
nl: melkaroma
ru: ароматизатор молоко, ароматизатор топленое молоко

fr: arôme naturel de gentiane
de: natürliches Enzianaroma
es: aroma natural de genciana
fi: luontainen katkeroaromi
hu: természetes genciana aroma
it: aroma naturale di genziana
nl: natuurlijk gentiaanaroma

en: coconut flavouring
de: Kokosaroma, Kokosnuss-Aroma
es: Sabor a coco
fi: kookosaromi
fr: arôme de noix de coco
hr: aroma kokosa
hu: kókusz aroma
it: aroma di cocco
nl: kokosaroma, kokosnoot-aroma

en: natural coconut flavouring
de: natürliches Kokosaroma, natürliches Kokosnuss-Aroma
el: φυσικο άρωμα καρύδας
es: aroma natural de coco
fi: luontainen kookosaromi
fr: arôme naturel de noix de coco
hr: prirodna aroma kokosa
hu: természetes kókusz aroma
it: aroma naturale di cocco
nl: natuurlijk kokosnoot-aroma, natuurlijk kokosnootaroma

en: natural herbs flavouring
de: natürliches Kräutergewürz
fi: luontainen yrttiaromi
fr: arôme naturel d'herbes
hr: prirodne arome bilja
hu: természetes gyógynövény aroma
it: aroma naturale di erbe

en: natural goat cheese flavouring
de: natürliches Ziegenkäse-Aroma
es: aroma natural de queso de cabra
fi: luontainen vuohenjuustoaromi
fr: arôme naturel de fromage de chèvre
hr: prirodna aroma kozjeg sira
hu: természetes kecskesajt aroma
it: Aroma di formaggio di capra naturale

en: natural eucalyptus flavouring
da: naturlig eukalyptusaroma
de: natürliches Eukalyptusaroma
es: aroma natural de eucalipto
fi: eukalyptusaromi
fr: arôme naturel d'eucalyptus
hr: prirodna aroma eukaliptusa
hu: természetes eukaliptusz aroma
it: aroma naturale di eucalipto

en: natural fish flavouring
de: natürliches Fischaroma, natürliches Fisch-Aroma
fi: luontainen kala-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de poisson
hr: prirodna aroma ribe
hu: természetes hal aroma
it: aroma naturale di pesce